Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2

Powers and Duties of Commission

57-1-201. Transfer of provisions relating to intoxicating beverages — Authority to impose fine instead of license suspension or revocation.

The entire provisions, definitions and terms of chapter 3, parts 1, 2 and 4 of this title, § 57-3-304 and the authority contained therein are hereby transferred and shall be vested under the jurisdiction of the alcoholic beverage commission as though all of the provisions of such sections were set out and copied verbatim herein for the purpose of the commission to carry out this chapter.

In any case where the commission is given the power to suspend or revoke any license or permit, it may impose a fine. Fines imposed shall:

Not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) for servers permitted under § 57-4-203(h) and the Alcohol Server Responsibility and Training Act of 1995, compiled in chapter 3, part 7 of this title;

Not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for retailers licensed under § 57-3-204; provided, that the commission may impose a fine in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in accordance with § 57-3-406(d)(3);

Not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for permittees authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises under § 57-4-201; provided, that the commission may impose a fine in excess of one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) in accordance with § 57-4-203(b)(1)(C);

Not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000) for wholesalers licensed under § 57-3-203; and

Not exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for manufacturers licensed under chapter 2 of this title or § 57-3-202.

For the purpose of imposing fines hereunder, each violation may be treated as a separate offense.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(1)(A), no administrative action, including the imposition of a fine, may be brought against a wholesaler for a violation of § 57-3-301(d) unless, prior to bringing the action, the commissioner of revenue has provided written notice to the wholesaler advising the wholesaler that the tax for a brand of liquor has not been paid by a supplier.

The commission shall deposit collections of any such fine with the state treasurer, for the general funds of the state.

The commission shall promulgate by rule pursuant to the Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, a schedule setting forth a range of fines for each violation.

Any document a person receives informing the person of having a fine imposed upon such person shall cite each particular rule or statute the person is being charged with violating.

In any case where the commission is authorized to suspend or revoke a license or permit, it may enter into an agreement by order with the licensee or permittee where the licensee or permittee voluntarily surrenders the license or permit. Such surrender shall be deemed a revocation of the license or permit.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, §§ 11-32, 34-49; T.C.A., § 57-811; Acts 1981, ch. 474, § 1; 1985, ch. 76, § 2; 2001, ch. 79, §§ 1-3; 2008, ch. 773, § 1; 2012, ch. 947, § 7; 2016, ch. 898, §§ 1, 4; 2016, ch. 908, § 1; 2017, ch. 147, § 14.

57-1-202. Transfer of provisions relating to contraband liquor.

The duties, authority, powers and functions as contained and enumerated in §57-9-115 and chapter 9, part 2 of this title are hereby transferred and vested in the commission as though the same were set out and copied verbatim herein, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

Acts 1963, ch. 258, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 57-812.

57-1-203. Transfer of duties relating to price regulations.

Certain duties, powers and functions authorized under chapter 6, part 2 of this title are hereby transferred and vested in the alcoholic beverage commission as though the same were set out and copied verbatim herein, for the purpose of carrying out this chapter, except those duties, powers, and functions as provided for in §57-1-204.

Acts 1963, ch. 259, § 2; T.C.A., § 57-813.

57-1-204. Department of revenue authority to collect certain taxes and make audits — Appropriation of funds to commission.

The department of revenue shall continue to collect the tax as levied and imposed under § 57-6-201, and the required monthly reports thereunder shall continue to be made to the department.

All such tax collected by the department shall be deposited in the treasury of the state to the credit of and to be used by the commission for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Such funds are hereby appropriated to the commission for the purpose of the administration and enforcement of the duties, powers and functions of the commission.

The authority now vested in the commissioner of revenue to make the required audits, examinations of books, records and papers, and the filing of invoices, as provided for under § 57-6-202, shall remain vested in the commissioner.

Acts 1963, ch. 259, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-814.

57-1-205. Alcoholic beverage tax collection.

The alcoholic beverage tax levied and authorized to be collected under §§57-3-302 and57-3-303 shall continue to be collected by the commissioner of revenue in the same manner as now prescribed by law.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 33; T.C.A., § 57-815.

57-1-206. [Reserved.]

The commissioner of revenue shall make a written report monthly to the alcoholic beverage commission showing the name of each licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any tax owing to this state, and such report shall show the kind and amount of such delinquent tax. Each page of the written report shall be on paper measuring eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") and shall contain information on not more than one (1) licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any tax owing to this state.

Each licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any of the taxes imposed upon such dealer by law, and who fails, refuses or neglects to pay the tax when due, may have that dealer's license suspended by the commission in its discretion after due notice and hearing as now authorized under § 57-3-214. If a dealer is delinquent in paying the required taxes for as many as three (3) times in a calendar year, the commission may revoke the dealer's license.

The commissioner of revenue shall on or before December 1 of each calendar year furnish to the commission a written report showing the name of each licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any tax owing to this state. Each page of the written report shall be on paper measuring eight and one-half inches by eleven inches (8½" x 11") and shall contain information on not more than one (1) licensed dealer who is delinquent in the payment or remittance of any tax owing to this state. The report shall include the kind and the amount of such delinquent tax. Any dealer delinquent in taxes shall not have that dealer's license renewed by the commission for the next calendar year until all of the delinquent taxes have been paid, and so certified to the commission by the commissioner of revenue.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 33; T.C.A., § 57-817; Acts 1993, ch. 144, § 1; 1999, ch. 403, §§ 3, 4.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Bankruptcy, § 6.

57-1-208. [Repealed.]

Acts 1979, ch. 394, § 1; T.C.A., § 57-820; Acts 1984, ch. 915, § 2; 2017, ch. 372, § 1; repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 372, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 57-1-208, concerning enforcement of §39-17-417(g), was repealed by Acts 2017, ch. 372, § 1, effective January 1, 2018.

57-1-209. Rules and regulations — Annual report.

The commission is hereby authorized to adopt and promulgate the present rules and regulations which are in existence pertaining to alcoholic beverages, and the commission may in its discretion alter, amend or repeal any of such parts of such rules and regulations as it deems necessary. The commission may promulgate rules governing the conduct of educational seminars conducted by businesses licensed pursuant to § 57-3-204, and such regulation may include the transportation and serving for sampling purposes only alcoholic beverages, notwithstanding §§ 57-3-402 and 57-3-404(h).

The executive director of the commission shall file an annual report with the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives no later than March 1 detailing with specificity each rule promulgated during the previous year together with the rationale for promulgating the rule.

Acts 1963, ch. 257, § 14; T.C.A., § 57-818; Acts 1998, ch. 765, § 1; 2012, ch. 947, § 6; 2013, ch. 236, § 68.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 16 Tenn. Juris., Intoxicating Liquors, §§ 3, 4.

57-1-210. Commission — Authority to investigate and/or arrest.

In addition to the other duties imposed under this chapter, the commission is authorized to investigate and/or to arrest, without warrant or process of any kind, any person whom the arresting officer has probable cause to believe is committing or attempting to commit a felony in violation of title 39, chapter 17, part 4, if the felony is committed on premises licensed by the commission, on any premises under investigation by the commission in conjunction with its other duties and responsibilities, and/or any other premises selling alcoholic beverages as defined in §57-3-101, whether licensed or unlicensed.

Acts 1991, ch. 166, § 1.

57-1-211. Warning signs at retail establishments.

Each licensee which sells alcoholic beverages at retail not for consumption on the premises and each licensee which sells alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises shall post, in a prominent place easily seen by its customers, a warning sign supplied by the alcoholic beverage commission, which meets the requirements of subsections (b) and (c). The signs shall contain a warning that drinking alcoholic beverages during pregnancy can cause birth defects, including fetal alcohol syndrome and fetal alcohol effects.

The alcoholic beverage commission shall prepare the signs required by this section and make them available at no cost to those licensees described in subsection (a) by August 30, 1997, and when a new license is issued to a person for the sale of alcoholic beverages at retail or for consumption on the premises. The bureau of alcohol and drug abuse services shall assist the alcoholic beverage commission in preparing such signs upon request of the commission.

The signs required by this section shall be composed of black, capital letters printed on white laminated paper at a minimum weight of one hundred ten pound (110 lb.) index. The letters comprising the word “WARNING” shall be highlighted black lettering and such word shall be larger than all other lettering on the sign. The size of the sign shall be approximately thirteen inches (13") by nine and one-half inches (9 ½").

If the alcoholic beverage commission finds that a licensee has failed to post the sign required by this section, the alcoholic beverage commission shall notify the licensee in writing of the violation. A licensee who fails to post such sign within twenty-four (24) hours of receiving such written notification shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each day the licensee is in violation.

Acts 1997, ch. 492, § 1; 1998, ch. 765, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. For an Order transferring the bureau of alcohol and drug abuse services from the department of health to the department of mental health and developmental disabilities, except for functions related to the licensing of alcohol and drug abuse counselors, see Executive Order No. 44 (February 23, 2007).

Cross-References. Child abuse and neglect, §39-15-401.

57-1-212. Retired agents' service weapons after twenty-five (25) years of service.

Any agent of the alcoholic beverage commission who retires after twenty-five (25) years of honorable service shall be issued by the commission a retired commission card, which shall identify the agent, the agent’s department and rank, and the fact that the agent is retired. Cards issued under this provision shall bear the inscription, in print of equal or larger size than the rest of the printing on the card, the words “Not a handgun permit.” After twenty-five (25) years of honorable service as an agent of the commission, the commission shall authorize the agent, upon retirement, to retain the agent’s service weapon, in recognition of the agent’s many years of good and faithful public service.

T.C.A., § 38–6–105(b).

Code Commission Notes.

This section was transferred from former §38-6-105(b) by the code commission in 2006.

57-1-213.
Assessment of costs of hearing held in accordance with contested case provisions.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the alcoholic beverage commission may assess the actual and reasonable costs of any hearing held in accordance with the contested case provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, part 3, and in which sanctions of any kind are imposed on any person or entity required to be licensed, permitted, registered or otherwise authorized by the commission. These costs may include, but are not limited to, those incurred and assessed for the time of the prosecuting attorneys, investigators, expert witnesses, administrative judges and any other persons involved in the investigation, prosecution and hearing of the action.

The commission shall promulgate rules and regulations establishing a schedule of costs that may be assessed pursuant to this section. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

All costs assessed pursuant to this section shall become final thirty (30) days after the date a final order of assessment is served.

If the individual or entity disciplined fails to pay an assessment when it becomes final, the commission may apply to the appropriate court for a judgment and seek execution of the judgment.

Jurisdiction for recovery of the costs shall be in the chancery court of Davidson County.

Acts 2012, ch. 1063, § 1.

57-1-214. Suspension or revocation of license to sell alcoholic beverages and beer or malt beverages.

In any county other than those included in §§ 57-4-202(d) and 57-5-108(p), if the alcoholic beverage commission suspends or revokes a license to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises at any establishment for any violation or violations as provided in chapter 4 of this title, then the commission shall notify the local beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages within such county by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the action taken by the commission. Such notice shall include the record of evidence and the determination made by the commission in suspending or revoking the license of the establishment.

Upon receipt of such notice, the local beer board may temporarily suspend the beer permit of the establishment and shall:

Schedule a hearing for the next regularly scheduled meeting of the local beer board to be held at least fourteen (14) days following the date the local beer board receives the certified letter to provide an opportunity for the permit holder to appear and show cause why the permit to sell beer on the premises should not be suspended or revoked for a violation or violations as provided in chapter 4 of this title, based on actions taken by the commission; and

Notify the individual or business entity, which is listed as the permit holder at the same location where the alcoholic beverage license had been suspended or revoked, of the date and time of the hearing.

If the local beer board finds at a hearing that a sufficient violation or violations have occurred as provided in chapter 4 of this title, at such location, then the local beer board may suspend or revoke the permit to the same extent and at least for the same period of time as the commission has suspended or revoked the license of the establishment.

If the permit holder fails to appear or decides to surrender the permit to the local beer board in lieu of appearing at the hearing, the permit may be suspended or revoked by the local beer board; provided, that if the permit is suspended or revoked, no permit to sell beer or malt beverages on the premises shall be issued by the local beer board to any person for the location where the commission had suspended or revoked the license for the period of time included in the decision of the commission.

The decision of the local beer board is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the local beer board in accordance with § 57-5-108.

In any county other than those included in §§ 57-4-202(d) and 57-5-108(p), if a local beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages finds a violation or violations, as provided in chapter 4 of this title, in the sale of beer or malt beverages consumed on-premises of an establishment located within the local beer board's jurisdiction that result in the local beer board suspending the operation of or revoking the permit of the establishment where the violation or violations occurred, then the local beer board shall notify the executive director of the commission by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the action taken by the local beer board. Such notice shall include the record of evidence and the determination made by the local beer board in suspending or revoking the permit.

Upon receipt of such notice, the executive director of the commission may take the action with respect to a violation or violations as provided in chapter 4 of this title, related to the license for the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises at the location where the violation or violations of the chapter occurred.

The suspension or revocation decision of the local beer board made pursuant to this subsection (b) is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the local beer board in accordance with § 57-5-108.

Acts 2013, ch. 316, § 1.

57-1-207. Delinquent tax — Penalty — Reports.